Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.220

Employer and member contribution rates.

The required contribution rates to the retirement system for both members and employers shall be established by the director from time to time as may be necessary upon the advice of the state actuary. The state actuary shall use the aggregate actuarial cost method to calculate contribution rates. The employer contribution rate calculated under this section shall be used only for the purpose of determining the amount of employer contributions to be deposited in the plan 2 fund from the total employer contributions collected under RCW 41.37.080.

Contribution rates required to fund the costs of the retirement system shall always be equal for members and employers, except under this section. Any adjustments in contribution rates required from time to time for future costs shall likewise be shared equally by the members and employers.

Any increase in the contribution rate required as the result of a failure of an employer to make any contribution required by this section shall be borne in full by the employer not making the contribution.

The director shall notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the required contribution rate and the increase shall be announced at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the change.

A member's contributions required by this section shall be deducted from the member's compensation earnable each payroll period. The member's contribution and the employer's contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll period ends.

[ 2004 c 242 s 28.]